Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.630

Authority of director to call special meeting of board.

The director may request a special meeting of the board of a credit union if the director believes that a special meeting is necessary for the welfare of the credit union or the purposes of this chapter. The director's request for a special board meeting must be made in writing to the secretary of the board. On receipt of such a request, the secretary shall designate a time and place for the special board meeting, which shall be held within thirty days after receipt of the request. The director may require the attendance of all of the directors at the special board meeting, and an absence unexcused by the director constitutes a violation of this chapter.

[ 2013 c 34 s 11; 1997 c 397 s 58; 1994 c 92 s 216; 1984 c 31 s 67. Formerly RCW 31.12.655.]